Nebraska, session 109, LB1145.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1145 LB1145
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 84-1411, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
84-1411 (1)(a) Except as provided in subsection (9) of this section,
each public body shall give reasonable advance publicized notice of the
time and place of each meeting by a method designated by each public body
and recorded in its minutes as provided in this subsection. Such notice
shall be transmitted to all members of the public body and to the public.
(b)(i) Except as provided in subdivision (1)(b)(ii) of this section,
in the case of a public body described in subdivision (1)(a)(i) of
section 84-1409 or such body's advisory committees, such notice shall be
given at least twice a year of the regular meeting schedule, location,
and the method designated by the public body to provide reasonable
advance publicized notice. Such notice shall be given by publication in a
legal newspaper of general circulation within the public body's
jurisdiction. by:
(ii) Subdivision (1)(b)(i) of this section shall not apply in the
case of the governing body of a city of the second class or village, any
advisory committee of such governing body, or the governing body of a
rural or suburban fire protection district.
(iii) Failure to comply with subdivision (1)(b)(i) of this section
shall not cause any motion, resolution, rule, regulation, ordinance, or
formal action of a public body made or taken at a meeting of the public
body to be void or voidable.
(A)(I) Publication in a newspaper of general circulation within the
public body's jurisdiction that is finalized for printing prior to the
time and date of the meeting, (II) posting on such newspaper's website,
if available, and (III) posting on a statewide website, if available,
established and maintained as a repository for such notices by a majority
of Nebraska newspapers. Such notice shall be placed in the newspaper and
on the websites by the newspaper; or
(B)(I) Posting to the newspaper's website, if available, and (II)
-2-

LB1145 LB1145
2026 2026
posting to a statewide website, if available, established and maintained
as a repository for such notices by a majority of Nebraska newspapers if
no edition of a newspaper of general circulation within the public body's
jurisdiction is to be finalized for printing prior to the time and date
of the meeting. Such notice shall be placed in the newspaper and on the
websites by the newspaper.
(ii) In the case of the governing body of a city of the second class
or village, any advisory committee of such governing body, or the
governing body of a rural or suburban fire protection district, such
notice shall be given by:
(A)(I) Publication in a newspaper of general circulation within the
public body's jurisdiction that is finalized for printing prior to the
time and date of the meeting, (II) posting on such newspaper's website,
if available, and (III) posting on a statewide website, if available,
established and maintained as a repository for such notices by a majority
of Nebraska newspapers. Such notice shall be placed in the newspaper and
on the websites by the newspaper;
(B)(I) Posting to the newspaper's website, if available, and (II)
posting on a statewide website, if available, established and maintained
as a repository for such notices by a majority of Nebraska newspapers if
no edition of a newspaper of general circulation within the public body's
jurisdiction is to be finalized for printing prior to the time and date
of the meeting. Such notice shall be placed in the newspaper and on the
websites by the newspaper; or
(C) Posting written notice in three conspicuous public places in
such city, village, or district. Such notice shall be posted by the
public body in the same three places for each meeting.
(iii) In the case of a public body not described in subdivision (1)
(b)(i) or (ii) of this section, such notice shall be given by a method
designated by the public body.
(c) For a public body that decides to publish notice in a newspaper
-3-

LB1145 LB1145
2026 2026
of general circulation within the public body's jurisdiction to meet the
notice requirement in subdivision (1)(a) of this section, in (iv) In case
of refusal, neglect, or inability of the newspaper to publish the notice,
the public body shall (i) (A) post such notice on its website, if
available, (ii) (B) request the newspaper submit a post on a statewide
website, if available, established and maintained as a repository for
such notices by a majority of Nebraska newspapers, and (iii) (C) post
such notice in a conspicuous public place in such public body's
jurisdiction. The public body shall keep a written record of such posting
pursuant to subdivision (1)(c)(i) (1)(b)(iv)(A) and (iii) (C) of this
section and a written record of the request to the newspaper pursuant to
subdivision (1)(c)(ii) (1)(b)(iv)(B) of this section. The record of such
posting shall be evidence that such posting was done as required and
shall be sufficient to fulfill the requirement of publication.
(c) In addition to a method of notice required by subdivision (1)(b)
(i) or (ii) of this section, such notice may also be provided by any
other appropriate method designated by such public body or such advisory
committee.
(d) Each public body shall record the methods and dates of such
notice in its minutes.
(e) Such notice shall contain an agenda of subjects known at the
time of the publicized notice or a statement that the agenda, which shall
be kept continually current, shall be readily available for public
inspection at the principal office of the public body during normal
business hours. Agenda items shall be sufficiently descriptive to give
the public reasonable notice of the matters to be considered at the
meeting. Except for items of an emergency nature, the agenda shall not be
altered later than (i) twenty-four hours before the scheduled
commencement of the meeting or (ii) forty-eight hours before the
scheduled commencement of a meeting of a city council or village board
scheduled outside the corporate limits of the municipality. The public
-4-

LB1145 LB1145
2026 2026
body shall have the right to modify the agenda to include items of an
emergency nature only at such public meeting.
(2)(a) The following entities may hold a meeting by means of virtual
conferencing if the requirements of subdivision (2)(b) of this section
are met:
(i) A state agency, state board, state commission, state council, or
state committee, or an advisory committee of any such state entity;
(ii) An organization, including the governing body, created under
the Interlocal Cooperation Act, the Joint Public Agency Act, or the
Municipal Cooperative Financing Act;
(iii) The governing body of a public power district having a
chartered territory of more than one county in this state;
(iv) The governing body of a public power and irrigation district
having a chartered territory of more than one county in this state;
(v) An educational service unit;
(vi) The Educational Service Unit Coordinating Council;
(vii) An organization, including the governing body, of a risk
management pool or its advisory committees organized in accordance with
the Intergovernmental Risk Management Act;
(viii) A community college board of governors;
(ix) The Nebraska Brand Committee;
(x) A local public health department;
(xi) A metropolitan utilities district;
(xii) A regional metropolitan transit authority; and
(xiii) A natural resources district.
(b) The requirements for holding a meeting by means of virtual
conferencing are as follows:
(i) Reasonable advance publicized notice is given as provided in
subsection (1) of this section, including providing access to a dial-in
number or link to the virtual conference;
(ii) In addition to the public's right to participate by virtual
-5-

LB1145 LB1145
2026 2026
conferencing, reasonable arrangements are made to accommodate the
public's right to attend at a physical site and participate as provided
in section 84-1412, including reasonable seating, in at least one
designated site in a building open to the public and identified in the
notice, with: At least one member of the entity holding such meeting, or
his or her designee, present at each site; a recording of the hearing by
audio or visual recording devices; and a reasonable opportunity for
input, such as public comment or questions, is provided to at least the
same extent as would be provided if virtual conferencing was not used;
(iii) At least one copy of all documents being considered at the
meeting is available at any physical site open to the public where
individuals may attend the virtual conference. The public body shall also
provide links to an electronic copy of the agenda, all documents being
considered at the meeting, and the current version of the Open Meetings
Act; and
(iv) Except as otherwise provided in this subdivision, subsection
(1) of section 70-1014, subsection (2) of section 70-1014.02, or
subsection (4) of section 79-2204, no more than one-half of the meetings
of the state entities, advisory committees, boards, councils,
organizations, or governing bodies are held by virtual conferencing in a
calendar year. In the case of (A) an organization created under the
Interlocal Cooperation Act that sells electricity or natural gas, (B) an
organization created under the Municipal Cooperative Financing Act, (C) a
governing body of a risk management pool and any advisory committee of
such governing body, or (D) any advisory committee of any state entity
created in response to the Opioid Prevention and Treatment Act, such
organization, governing body, or committee may hold more than one-half of
its meetings by virtual conferencing if such organization holds at least
one meeting each calendar year that is not by virtual conferencing.
(3) Virtual conferencing, emails, faxes, or other electronic
communication shall not be used to circumvent any of the public
-6-

LB1145 LB1145
2026 2026
government purposes established in the Open Meetings Act.
(4) The secretary or other designee of each public body shall
maintain a list of the news media requesting notification of meetings and
shall make reasonable efforts to provide advance notification to them of
the time and place of each meeting and the subjects to be discussed at
that meeting.
(5) When it is necessary to hold an emergency meeting without
reasonable advance public notice, the nature of the emergency shall be
stated in the minutes and any formal action taken in such meeting shall
pertain only to the emergency. Such emergency meetings may be held by
virtual conferencing. The provisions of subsection (4) of this section
shall be complied with in conducting emergency meetings. Complete minutes
of such emergency meetings specifying the nature of the emergency and any
formal action taken at the meeting shall be made available to the public
by no later than the end of the next regular business day.
(6) A public body may allow a member of the public or any other
witness to appear before the public body by means of virtual
conferencing.
(7)(a) Notwithstanding subsections (2) and (5) of this section, if
an emergency is declared by the Governor pursuant to the Emergency
Management Act as defined in section 81-829.39, a public body the
territorial jurisdiction of which is included in the emergency
declaration, in whole or in part, may hold a meeting by virtual
conferencing during such emergency if the public body gives reasonable
advance publicized notice as described in subsection (1) of this section.
The notice shall include information regarding access for the public and
news media. In addition to any formal action taken pertaining to the
emergency, the public body may hold such meeting for the purpose of
briefing, discussion of public business, formation of tentative policy,
or the taking of any action by the public body.
(b) The public body shall provide access by providing a dial-in
-7-

LB1145 LB1145
2026 2026
number or a link to the virtual conference. The public body shall also
provide links to an electronic copy of the agenda, all documents being
considered at the meeting, and the current version of the Open Meetings
Act. Reasonable arrangements shall be made to accommodate the public's
right to hear and speak at the meeting and record the meeting. Subsection
(4) of this section shall be complied with in conducting such meetings.
(c) The nature of the emergency shall be stated in the minutes.
Complete minutes of such meeting specifying the nature of the emergency
and any formal action taken at the meeting shall be made available for
inspection as provided in subsection (5) of section 84-1413.
(8) In addition to any other statutory authorization for virtual
conferencing, any public body not listed in subdivision (2)(a) of this
section may hold a meeting by virtual conferencing if:
(a) The purpose of the virtual meeting is to discuss items that are
scheduled to be discussed or acted upon at a subsequent non-virtual open
meeting of the public body;
(b) No action is taken by the public body at the virtual meeting;
and
(c) The public body complies with subdivisions (2)(b)(i) and (ii) of
this section.
(9) This section does not apply to a meeting of the Nebraska Power
Review Board or a public power district, a public power and irrigation
district, an electric membership association, an electric cooperative
company, a municipality having a generation and distribution system, or a
registered group of municipalities if such meeting is subject to section
70-1034.
Sec. 2. Original section 84-1411, Revised Statutes Supplement,
2025, is repealed.
-8-